Utah statutes.
57-19-9.   Duration of registration -- Amendment and renewal -- Supplemental disclosure -- Notice of amendment.

(1)  Registration of a project is effective for a period of one year and may, upon application, be renewed for successive periods of one year each.

(2)  A registration may be amended at any time, for any reason, by filing an amended application for registration, which amended registration shall become effective in the manner provided in Section 57-19-6.

(3)  The written disclosure required to be furnished to prospective purchasers pursuant to Section 57-19-11 shall be supplemented as often as is necessary to keep the required information reasonably current.  These supplements shall be filed with the director as provided in Section 57-19-8.

(4)  Every developer shall provide timely notice sent to the director of any event which has occurred which may have a material adverse effect on the conduct of the operation of the project.  In addition to this notification, the developer shall, within 30 days of the occurrence of that event, file an amendment to the registration disclosing the information previously provided.

(5)  Each application for renewal of a registration and each supplementary filing as provided in this section shall be accompanied by a fee of $200.

